Illinois, session 104th, SB1437.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 12-7.1 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/12-7.1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 12-7.1)7    Sec. 12-7.1. Hate crime. 8    (a) A person commits hate crime when, by reason of the 9actual or perceived race, color, creed, religion, ancestry, 10gender, sexual orientation, physical or mental disability, 11citizenship, immigration status, or national origin of another 12individual or group of individuals, regardless of the 13existence of any other motivating factor or factors: , he or 14she15        (1) The person commits assault, battery, aggravated 16    assault, intimidation, stalking, cyberstalking, 17    misdemeanor theft, criminal trespass to residence, 18    misdemeanor criminal damage to property, criminal trespass 19    to vehicle, criminal trespass to real property, mob 20    action, disorderly conduct, transmission of obscene 21    messages, harassment by telephone, or harassment through 22    electronic communications as these crimes are defined in 23    Sections 12-1, 12-2, 12-3(a), 12-7.3, 12-7.5, 16-1, 19-4,   SB1437- 2 -LRB104 08041 RLC 18087 b1    21-1, 21-2, 21-3, 25-1, 26-1, 26.5-1, 26.5-2, paragraphs 2    (a)(1), (a)(2), and (a)(3) of Section 12-6, and paragraphs 3    (a)(2) and (a)(5) of Section 26.5-3 of this Code, 4    respectively.5        (2) The person displays or causes to be displayed, on 6    public or private property, a burning cross, a Nazi 7    swastika, or a noose, with the intent to intimidate a 8    person or group of persons or incite violence against a 9    person or group of persons. 10    (b) Except as provided in subsection (b-5), hate crime is 11a Class 4 felony for a first offense and a Class 2 felony for a 12second or subsequent offense.13    (b-5) Hate crime is a Class 3 felony for a first offense 14and a Class 2 felony for a second or subsequent offense if 15committed:16        (1) in, or upon the exterior or grounds of, a church, 17    synagogue, mosque, or other building, structure, or place 18    identified or associated with a particular religion or 19    used for religious worship or other religious purpose;20        (2) in a cemetery, mortuary, or other facility used 21    for the purpose of burial or memorializing the dead;22        (3) in a school or other educational facility, 23    including an administrative facility or public or private 24    dormitory facility of or associated with the school or 25    other educational facility;26        (4) in a public park or an ethnic or religious   SB1437- 3 -LRB104 08041 RLC 18087 b1    community center;2        (5) on the real property comprising any location 3    specified in clauses (1) through (4) of this subsection 4    (b-5); or5        (6) on a public way within 1,000 feet of the real 6    property comprising any location specified in clauses (1) 7    through (4) of this subsection (b-5).8    (b-10) Upon imposition of any sentence, the trial court 9shall also either order restitution paid to the victim or 10impose a fine in an amount to be determined by the court based 11on the severity of the crime and the injury or damages suffered 12by the victim. In addition, any order of probation or 13conditional discharge entered following a conviction or an 14adjudication of delinquency shall include a condition that the 15offender perform public or community service of no less than 16200 hours if that service is established in the county where 17the offender was convicted of hate crime. In addition, any 18order of probation or conditional discharge entered following 19a conviction or an adjudication of delinquency shall include a 20condition that the offender enroll in an educational program 21discouraging hate crimes involving the protected class 22identified in subsection (a) that gave rise to the offense the 23offender committed. The educational program must be attended 24by the offender in-person and may be administered, as 25determined by the court, by a university, college, community 26college, non-profit organization, the Illinois Holocaust and   SB1437- 4 -LRB104 08041 RLC 18087 b1Genocide Commission, or any other organization that provides 2educational programs discouraging hate crimes, except that 3programs administered online or that can otherwise be attended 4remotely are prohibited. The court may also impose any other 5condition of probation or conditional discharge under this 6Section. If the court sentences the offender to imprisonment 7or periodic imprisonment for a violation of this Section, as a 8condition of the offender's mandatory supervised release, the 9court shall require that the offender perform public or 10community service of no less than 200 hours and enroll in an 11educational program discouraging hate crimes involving the 12protected class identified in subsection (a) that gave rise to 13the offense the offender committed. 14    (c) Independent of any criminal prosecution or the result 15of a criminal prosecution, any person suffering injury to his 16or her person, damage to his or her property, intimidation as 17defined in paragraphs (a)(1), (a)(2), and (a)(3) of Section 1812-6 of this Code, stalking as defined in Section 12-7.3 of 19this Code, cyberstalking as defined in Section 12-7.5 of this 20Code, disorderly conduct as defined in paragraph (a)(1), 21(a)(4), (a)(5), or (a)(6) of Section 26-1 of this Code, 22transmission of obscene messages as defined in Section 26.5-1 23of this Code, harassment by telephone as defined in Section 2426.5-2 of this Code, or harassment through electronic 25communications as defined in paragraphs (a)(2) and (a)(5) of 26Section 26.5-3 of this Code as a result of a hate crime may   SB1437- 5 -LRB104 08041 RLC 18087 b1bring a civil action for damages, injunction or other 2appropriate relief. The court may award actual damages, 3including damages for emotional distress, as well as punitive 4damages. The court may impose a civil penalty up to $25,000 for 5each violation of this subsection (c). A judgment in favor of a 6person who brings a civil action under this subsection (c) 7shall include attorney's fees and costs. After consulting with 8the local State's Attorney, the Attorney General may bring a 9civil action in the name of the People of the State for an 10injunction or other equitable relief under this subsection 11(c). In addition, the Attorney General may request and the 12court may impose a civil penalty up to $25,000 for each 13violation under this subsection (c). The parents or legal 14guardians, other than guardians appointed pursuant to the 15Juvenile Court Act or the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, of an 16unemancipated minor shall be liable for the amount of any 17judgment for all damages rendered against such minor under 18this subsection (c) in any amount not exceeding the amount 19provided under Section 5 of the Parental Responsibility Law.20    (d) "Sexual orientation" has the meaning ascribed to it in 21paragraph (O-1) of Section 1-103 of the Illinois Human Rights 22Act.23    (e) The provisions of this amendatory Act of the 104th 24General Assembly are severable under Section 1.31 of the 25Statute on Statutes. 26(Source: P.A. 102-235, eff. 1-1-22; 102-468, eff. 1-1-22;   SB1437- 6 -LRB104 08041 RLC 18087 b1102-813, eff. 5-13-22.)